Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.017

Criteria for confinement and parole.

(1) The board shall cause to be prepared criteria for duration of confinement, release on parole, and length of parole for persons committed to prison for crimes committed before July 1, 1984.

The proposed criteria should take into consideration RCW 9.95.009(2). Before submission to the governor, the board shall solicit comments and review on their proposed criteria for parole release.

(2) Persons committed to the department of corrections and who are under the authority of the board for crimes committed on or after September 1, 2001, are subject to the provisions for duration of confinement, release to community custody, and length of community custody established in RCW 9.94A.507, 9.94A.704, 72.09.335, and 9.95.420 through 9.95.440.

[ 2009 c 28 s 22; 2008 c 231 s 40; 2003 c 218 s 2; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 321; 1986 c 224 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Application—Application of repealers—Effective date—2008 c 231: See notes following RCW 9.94A.701.

Severability—2008 c 231: See note following RCW 9.94A.500.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.

Effective date—Severability—1986 c 224: See notes following RCW 9.95.001.